data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX r   0        -nos-ei         ir
SFX r   0        -se-ei          ir
SFX r   0        -te-ei          ir
SFX r   0        -vos-ei         ir
SFX r   0        em-lhe          ir
SFX r   0        em-lhes         ir
SFX r   0        em-me           ir
SFX r   0        em-na           ir
SFX r   0        em-nas          ir
SFX r   0        em-no           ir
SFX r   0        em-nos          ir
SFX r   0        em-se           ir
SFX r   0        em-te           ir
SFX r   0        em-vos          ir
SFX r   ir       em-lhe          ir
SFX r   ir       em-lhes         ir
SFX r   ir       em-me           ir
SFX r   ir       em-na           ir
SFX r   ir       em-nas          ir
SFX r   ir       em-no           ir
SFX r   ir       em-nos          ir
SFX r   ir       em-se           ir
SFX r   ir       em-te           ir
SFX r   ir       em-vos          ir
SFX r   0        -la-emos        ir
SFX r   0        -las-emos       ir
SFX r   0        -lhe-emos       ir
SFX r   0        -lhes-emos      ir
SFX r   0        -lo-emos        ir
SFX r   0        -los-emos       ir
SFX r   0        -nos-emos       ir
SFX r   0        -te-emos        ir
SFX r   0        -vos-emos       ir
SFX r   0        -lhe-ia         ir
SFX r   0        -lhes-ia        ir
SFX r   0        -me-ia          ir
SFX r   0        -nos-ia         ir
SFX r   0        -se-ia          ir
SFX r   0        -te-ia          ir
SFX r   0        -vos-ia         ir
SFX r   0        -lhe-iam        ir
SFX r   0        -lhes-iam       ir
SFX r   0        -me-iam         ir
SFX r   0        -nos-iam        ir
SFX r   0        -se-iam         ir
SFX r   0        -te-iam         ir
SFX r   0        -vos-iam        ir
SFX r   0        íamo-nos        ir
SFX r   0        íamos-vos        ir
SFX r   0        íamos-lhe       ir
SFX r   0        íamos-lhes      ir
SFX r   0        íamos-te        ir
SFX r   ir       íamo-nos        ir
SFX r   ir       íamos-vos        ir
SFX r   ir       íamos-lhe       ir
SFX r   ir       íamos-lhes      ir
SFX r   ir       íamos-te        ir
SFX r   0        mo-la           ir
SFX r   0        mo-las          ir
SFX r   0        mo-lo           ir
SFX r   0        mo-los          ir
SFX r   0        mo-nos          ir
SFX r   0        mos-vos          ir
SFX r   0        mos-lhe         ir
SFX r   0        mos-lhes        ir
SFX r   0        mos-te          ir
SFX r   r        mo-la           ir
SFX r   r        mo-las          ir
SFX r   r        mo-lo           ir
SFX r   r        mo-los          ir
SFX r   r        mo-nos          ir
SFX r   r        mos-vos          ir
SFX r   r        mos-lhe         ir
SFX r   r        mos-lhes        ir
SFX r   r        mos-te          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-a           ir
SFX r   r        ndo-as          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-lhe         ir
SFX r   r        ndo-lhes        ir
SFX r   r        ndo-me          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-nos         ir
SFX r   r        ndo-o           ir
SFX r   r        ndo-os          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-se          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-te          ir
SFX r   r        ndo-vos         ir
SFX r   r        sse-a           ir
SFX r   r        sse-as          ir
SFX r   r        sse-lhe         ir
SFX r   r        sse-lhes        ir
SFX r   r        sse-me          ir
SFX r   r        sse-nos         ir
SFX r   r        sse-o           ir
SFX r   r        sse-os          ir
SFX r   r        sse-se          ir
SFX r   r        sse-te          ir
SFX r   r        sse-vos         ir
SFX r   r        ssem-lhe        ir
SFX r   r        ssem-lhes       ir
SFX r   r        ssem-me         ir
SFX r   r        ssem-na         ir
SFX r   r        ssem-nas        ir
SFX r   r        ssem-no         ir
SFX r   r        ssem-nos        ir
SFX r   r        ssem-te         ir
SFX r   r        ssem-vos        ir
SFX r   r        ste-a           ir
SFX r   r        ste-as          ir
SFX r   r        ste-lhe         ir
SFX r   r        ste-lhes        ir
SFX r   r        ste-me          ir
SFX r   r        ste-nos         ir
SFX r   r        ste-o           ir
SFX r   r        ste-os          ir
SFX r   r        ste-se          ir
SFX r   r        ste-te          ir
SFX r   r        ste-vos         ir
SFX r   r        u-a             ir
SFX r   r        u-as            ir
SFX r   r        u-lhe           ir
SFX r   r        u-lhes          ir
SFX r   r        u-me            ir
SFX r   r        u-nos           ir
SFX r   r        u-o             ir
SFX r   r        u-os            ir
SFX r   r        u-se            ir
SFX r   r        u-te            ir
SFX r   r        u-vos           ir
SFX r   etir     ita-a           etir
SFX r   etir     ita-as          etir
SFX r   etir     ita-lhe         etir
SFX r   etir     ita-lhes        etir
SFX r   etir     ita-me          etir
SFX r   etir     ita-nos         etir
SFX r   etir     ita-o           etir
SFX r   etir     ita-os          etir
SFX r   etir     ita-se          etir
SFX r   etir     ita-te          etir
SFX r   etir     ita-vos         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-lhe        etir
SFX r   etir     itam-lhes       etir
SFX r   etir     itam-me         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-na         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-nas        etir
SFX r   etir     itam-no         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-nos        etir
SFX r   etir     itam-se         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-te         etir
SFX r   etir     itam-vos        etir
SFX r   etir     itamo-nos       etir
SFX r   etir     itamos-vos       etir
SFX r   etir     itamos-lhe      etir
SFX r   etir     itamos-lhes     etir
SFX r   etir     itamos-te       etir
SFX r   etir     ito-a           etir
SFX r   etir     ito-as          etir
SFX r   etir     ito-lhe         etir
SFX r   etir     ito-lhes        etir
SFX r   etir     ito-me          etir
SFX r   etir     ito-nos         etir
SFX r   etir     ito-o           etir
SFX r   etir     ito-os          etir
SFX r   etir     ito-te          etir
SFX r   etir     ito-vos         etir
SFX r   0        -la-á           ver
SFX r   0        -las-á          ver
SFX r   0        -lhe-á          ver
SFX r   0        -lhes-á         ver
SFX r   0        -lo-á           ver
SFX r   0        -los-á          ver
SFX r   0        -me-á           ver
SFX r   0        -nos-á          ver
SFX r   0        -se-á           ver
SFX r   0        -te-á           ver
SFX r   0        -vos-á          ver
SFX r   0        -lhe-ão         ver
SFX r   0        -lhes-ão        ver
SFX r   0        -me-ão          ver
SFX r   0        -na-ão          ver
SFX r   0        -nas-ão         ver
SFX r   0        -no-ão          ver
SFX r   0        -nos-ão         ver
SFX r   0        -se-ão          ver
SFX r   0        -te-ão          ver
SFX r   0        -vos-ão         ver
SFX r   er       ê-me            ver
SFX r   er       ê-te            ver
SFX r   er       ê-se            ver
SFX r   er       ê-lhe           ver
SFX r   er       ê-lhes          ver
SFX r   er       ê-nos           ver
SFX r   er       ê-la            ver
SFX r   er       ê-las           ver
SFX r   er       ê-lo            ver
SFX r   er       ê-los           ver
SFX r   r        em-lhe          ver
SFX r   r        em-lhes         ver
SFX r   r        em-me           ver
SFX r   r        em-na           ver
SFX r   r        em-nas          ver
SFX r   r        em-no           ver
SFX r   r        em-nos          ver
SFX r   r        em-se           ver
SFX r   r        em-te           ver
SFX r   r        em-vos          ver
SFX r   0        -lhe-ei         ver
SFX r   0        -lhes-ei        ver
SFX r   0        -me-ei          ver
SFX r   0        -nos-ei         ver
SFX r   0        -se-ei          ver
SFX r   0        -te-ei          ver
SFX r   0        -vos-ei         ver
SFX r   er       ê-la-ei         ver
SFX r   er       ê-las-ei        ver
SFX r   er       ê-lo-ei         ver
SFX r   er       ê-los-ei        ver
SFX r   er       ê-la-emos       ver
SFX r   er       ê-las-emos      ver
