data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
abalaustrar/hrYMj
abaular/hrYMj
acântor/hr
adequar/hrYjLÀÄÂÑ
aderir/hrMjLÂ
adsorver/hrMbj
afazer/hrMjLÂ
aguar/hrYMjÂË
ajuizar/hrYMjLÂ
amarfanharferir/hrMjL
amortiguar/hrYMj
anaguar/hrYMj
antiquar/hrYMjL
apaniguar/hrYMj
apaziguar/hrYMjÂ
apor/hrÂ
apropinquar/hrYjL
aprouver/hrMbjÂ
arameizar/hrYj
arcaizar/hrYj
asserir/hrMjL
ateizar/hrYj
atreguar/hrYMj
auferir/hrMjL
averiguar/hrYj
bendizer/hrMjL
benfazer/hrMbj
biguar/hrYMj
caber/hrMbjÂò
carnifazer/hrMbj
circumpor/hr
coliquar/hrYjL
comedir/hrMjLÂ
competir/hrMjLÌÎà
compor/hrÂÀ
comprouver/hrMjLÂ
condizer/hrMbjLÂ
conferir/hrMjL
conjuizar/hrYjL
contiguar/hrYMj
contrassugerir/hrjL
credeizar/hrYj
decompor/hr
deferir/hrMjLÄ
defletir/hrMjL
deliquar/hrYMjL
depor/hr
deslinguar/hrYMj
desraizar/hrYj
diferir/hrMjL
digerir/hrMjL
disferir/hrMjL
dispor/hrÀÄì
dizer/hrMjLÀÂÍÏÓì
eguar/hrYMj
emboizar/hrYj
embuizar/hrYj
enquerir/hrMjL
enraizar/hrYMjÂÀ
entredizer/hrMjL
entrefazer/hrMbj
entreouvir/hrMjL
entrepor/hr
entrever/hrMbj
enxaguar/hrYMj
epopeizar/hrYj
esfazer/hrMjL
espedir/hr
estupefazer/hrMjL
europeizar/hrYjLÂ
exouvir/hrMjL
expedir/hrjLÀ
expor/hrÀËÌÈ
fazer/hrMjLÀÂËÏÓìî
ferir/hrMjLÀÂÄÍÏòÛì
fletir/hrMjLÀÄ
fraguar/hrYMj
gelifazer/hrMjL
genufletir/hrMjL
geografizar/hrYjLÂ
hebraizar/hrYj
hinduizar/hrYj
homogeneizar/hrYj
iguar/hrYMj
impedir/hrMjLÂ
impor/hrÀÂÌÎ
inquerir/hrMjL
inserir/hrMjLÀÂúÃ
judaizar/hrYjLÂ
juizar/hrYMjLÂ
justapor/hr
liquefazer/hrMjL
longinquar/hrYMjLò
malcondizer/hr
maldizer/hrMbjÀ
malfazer/hrMjL
malferir/hrMjL
malsatisfazer/hr
medir/hrjLÀÂõûÈ
melifluizar/hrYjL
minguar/hrYMjò
obliquar/hrYMjL
opor/hr
ouvir/hrMjLÀÂ
patefazer/hrMjL
paziguar/hrYMj
pedir/hrMjÀÂ
perfazer/hrMjL
perpetuizar/hrYjL
plebeizar/hrYj
por/hrÀÂËÈÌÍÏÓÔëìîñ
pressupor/hr
preterir/hrMjL
prever/hrMbj
prouver/hrMbjÂ
putrefazer/hrMjL
rarefazer/hrMjL
repetir/hrMjL
retrofletir/hrMjL
santiguar/hrYMj
satisfazer/hrMjLÂÃÄ
sobpor/hr
sugerir/hrjL
supor/hr
tabuizar/hrYj
telemedir/hrjL
toluizar/hrYjL
torrefazer/hrMjL
transferir/hrMjLÀ
tremefazer/hr
tumefazer/hrMjL
ubiquar/hrYjL
vacuefazer/hrMbj
